Utah statutes.
75-5a-106.   Transfer authorized by will or trust.
(1)  A personal representative or trustee may make an irrevocable transfer
under Section 75-5a-110 to a custodian for the benefit of a minor as
authorized in the governing will or trust.
(2)  If the testator or settlor has nominated a custodian under Section
75-5a-104 to receive the custodial property, the transfer must be made to that
person.
(3)  If the testator or settlor has not nominated a custodian under Section
75-5a-104, or all persons nominated as custodian die before the transfer or
are unable, decline, or are ineligible to serve, the personal representative
or the trustee, as the case may be, shall designate the custodian from among
those eligible to serve as custodian for property of that kind under
Subsection 75-5a-110(1).
